Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.050

Process—Who may serve.

All process issued by district court judges of the state and all executions and writs of attachment or of replevin shall be served by a sheriff or a deputy, but a summons or notice and complaint may be served by any citizen of the state of Washington over the age of eighteen years and not a party to the action.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1102; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 11; 1903 c 19 s 1; 1895 c 102 s 1; 1893 c 108 s 1; Code 1881 s 1716; 1873 p 337 s 23; RRS s 1762. Formerly RCW 12.04.050 and 12.04.060, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.